South Dakota, session 2026, HB1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $2,000,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Corrections, for the provision of a grant to a nonprofit corporation that delivers juvenile
diversion programming in Sioux Falls, in partnership with the Sioux Falls Police Department
and the Minnehaha County Sheriff's Office.
Section 2. To be awarded the grant, the nonprofit corporation must commit to coordinating
and hosting a week-long summer camp open to sixth graders identified by school resource
officers working in Sioux Falls for the purpose of building relationships with law enforcement
officers and being diverted from criminal activity. The camp must be held once each calendar
year, for ten years, beginning in 2026. The camp must include participation by members of
the Sioux Falls Police Department and the Minnehaha County Sheriff's Office. The nonprofit
corporation must also commit to coordinating and hosting three follow-up events within the
same calendar year as the summer camp for camp participants, their families, and law
enforcement officers.
Section 3. Until all moneys appropriated by this Act are expended, the nonprofit corporation
shall, on or before December first of each year, report to the special committee created by
§ 4-8A-2 on outcome measures for the diversion programming described in section 2 of this
Act. The special committee may propose outcome measures on which the nonprofit
corporation must report.
Section 4. The Department of Corrections shall award one-tenth of the moneys appropriated
by this Act to the nonprofit organization each calendar year beginning in 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.649.11 2 1097
Section 5. The secretary of the Department of Corrections shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 6. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2036, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 7. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.